New Jersey, session 222, A2408.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following appropriation made in section 1 of P.L.2025, c.74 is amended to read as follows: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid STATE AID 04-8030  Local Government Services [$945,063,000] $944,563,000 (From General Fund:[$155,850,000] $155,350,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid [$945,063,000] $944,563,000 (From General Fund:[$155,850,000] $155,350,000 State Aid: [04 City of Camden - Capital Projects....... ($500,000)] 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs GRANTS-IN-AID 05-8050  Community Resources ............. [$79,250,000] $79,750,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Social Services Programs .... [$87,750,000] $88,250,000 Grants-in-Aid: 05 Parkside Business & Community in Partnership ($500,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.